en: Roaster oven functions: Air fry; Bake; Broil; Convection; Defrost; Keep warm; Pizza; Reheat; Roast; Rotisserie; Slow cook; Steam; Other
th: ฟังก์ชั่นของเตาอบย่าง: ทอดด้วยลมร้อน; อบ; ย่าง; การพาความร้อน; ละลายน้ำแข็ง; อุ่น; พิซซ่า; อุ่นร้อนอีกครั้ง; ย่าง; ทรงหมุนย่าง; สโลว์คุก; ไอน้ำ; อื่นๆ
cs: Funkce pečicí trouby: Horkovzdušné fritování; Pečení; Opékání na grilu; Konvekce; Rozmrazování; Udržovat teplé; Pizza; Ohřev; Opékání; Rožnění; Pomalé vaření; Pára; Jiné
ro-RO: Funcțiile cuptorului cu rotisor: Prăjire cu aer cald; Coacere; Rumenire rapidă; Convecție; Decongelare; Menținere la cald; Pizza; Reîncălzire; Friptură; Rotisor; Gătire lentă; Abur; Altele
ko: 로스터 오븐 기능: 에어 프라이; 빵 굽기; 브로일; 컨벡션; 해동; 보온; 피자; 재가열; 로스트; 로티세리; 슬루우 쿠킹; 스팀; 기타
zh-CN: 烤箱功能: 空气炸; 烘烤; 炙烤; 对流; 解冻; 保温; 披萨; 再加热; 烤制; 旋转烤; 慢炖; 蒸; 其他
de: Grillofenfunktionen: Heißluftfrittieren; Backen; Grillen; Konvektion; Auftauen; Warm halten; Pizza; Aufwärmen; Braten; Rotisserie; Schongaren; Dampf; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Funkcije pećnice: Prženje na vrućem zraku; Pečenje; Pečenje s gornjim grijačem; Konvekcija; Odmrzavanje; Održavanje toplim; Pizza; Podgrijavanje; Pečenje na višim temperaturama; Pečenje na ražnju; Sporo kuhanje; Para; Ostalo
ru: Функции мини-печи: Аэрогриль; Выпечка; Гриль; Конвекция; Разморозка; Поддержание температуры; Пицца; Разогрев; Запекание; Вертел; Готовка на медленном огне; Приготовление на пару; Другое
hu: Sütő funkciói: Forrólevegős sütés; Sütés; Roston sütés; Konvekció; Kiolvasztás; Melegen tartás; Pizza; Újramelegítés; Átsütés; Grillsütés; Lassú főzés; Gőz; Egyéb
pl: Funkcje piekarnika: Pieczenie gorącym powietrzem; Pieczenie; Grillowanie; Konwekcja; Rozmrażanie; Utrzymanie ciepła; Pizza; Podgrzewanie; Pieczenie w wysokiej temperaturze; Pieczenie na rożnie; Wolnowar; Para; Inne
el: Λειτουργίες φούρνου ροστ: Τηγάνισμα στον αέρα; Φούρνισμα; Ψήσιμο στη σχάρα; Ψήσιμο με κυκλοφορία αέρα; Αφαιρώ; Διατήρηση θερμοκρασίας; Πίτσα; Ζέσταμα; Ψήσιμο; Ψήσιμο στη σούβλα; Αργό μαγείρεμα; Μαγείρεμα στον ατμό; Άλλο
pt-BR: Funções do forno com grelha: Fritar sem óleo; Assar; Grelhar; Convecção; Descongelar; Aquecer; Pizza; Reaquecer; Assar; Rotisserie; Cozimento lento; Vapor; Outro
sl-SI: Funkcije pečice za peko: Cvrenje na vroč zrak; Peka; Kuhanje na žaru; Konvekcija; Odtajanje; Hraniti na toplem; Pizza; Ponovno segrevanje; Pečenje; Raženj; Počasno kuhanje; Para; Druga
pt-PT: Funções do forno assador: Fritar com ar quente; Cozer; Assar; Convecção; Descongelar; Manter quente; Pizza; Reaquecer; Assar; Churrasco; Cozinhar lentamente; Vapor; Outro
ja: ロースターオーブンの機能: エアフライ; ベイク; ブロイル; コンベクション; 解凍; 保温; ピザ; 温め直し; ロースト; ロティサリー; スロークック; スチーム; その他
sv: Funktioner hos roaster-ugn: Airfry; Ugnsstekning; Halstring; Konvektion; Avfrosta; Värmning; Pizza; Återuppvärmning; Ugnsgrillning; Rotisserie; Långkok; Ånga; Annat
da: Stegeovns funktioner: Airfry; Bag; Grill; Konvektion; Optøning; Hold varm; Pizza; Genopvarm; Steg; Rotisserie; Langsom tilberedning; Damp; Andet
zh-TW: 烤箱功能: 氣炸; 烘焙; 烤; 對流; 解凍; 保溫; 披薩; 再加熱; 燒烤; 旋轉烤架; 慢燉; 蒸煮; 其他
sk-SK: Funkcie rúry na pečenie: Vzduchové vyprážanie; Pečenie; Opekanie; Konvekcia; Rozmrazovanie; Udržiavanie tepla; Pizza; Zohrievanie; Praženie; Ražeň; Pomalé varenie; Para; Iné
tr: Fırın işlevleri: Hava fritözü; Fırında pişirme; Broil; Konveksiyon; Buz çözme; Sıcak tutma; Pizza; Isıtma; Fırınlama; Çevirme; Yavaş pişirme; Buhar; Diğer
fi: Paahdinuunin toiminnot: Ilmafriteeraus; Paistaminen; Hiillostaminen; Konvektio; Sulatus; Lämpimänä pitäminen; Pizza; Uudelleen kuumentaminen; Paistaminen; Varras; Hauduttaminen; Höyry; Muu
bg-BG: Функции на фурната за печене: Пържене на въздух; Печене; Грил; Конвекция; Размразяване; Поддържане топло; Пица; Повторно затопляне; Изпичане; Въртящо се; Бавно готвене; Пара; Друго
fr: Fonctions de la rôtissoire: Friture à l’air; Cuisson; Gril supérieur; Convection; Décongélation; Maintien au chaud; Pizza; Réchauffage; Rôtissage; Rôtissoire; Cuisson lente; Vapeur; Autre
lt-LT: Krosnelės-skrudintuvės funkcijos: Gruzdinimas karštame ore; Kepimas; Troškinimas; Konvekcija; Atitirpinimas; Šilumos palaikymas; Pica; Pašildymas; Apskrudinimas; Kepimo ant iešmo sistema; Lėtasis virimas; Gaminimas garuose; Kita
it: Funzioni del forno elettrico per arrosti: Frittura ad aria; Cottura al forno; Grigliatura; Convezione; Scongelare; Tenere al caldo; Pizza; Riscaldare; Arrosto; Girarrosto; Cottura lenta; A vapore; Altro
es: Funciones del horno asador: Freír con aire; Hornear; Asar; Convección; Descongelar; Mantener caliente; Pizza; Recalentar; Asar; Asador; Cocción lenta; Vapor; Otros
vi: Chức năng của lò nướng điện: Chiên không dầu; Nướng; Nướng; Đối lưu; Rã đông; Giữ ấm; Pizza; Làm nóng lại; Nướng; Quay; Nấu chậm; Hơi nước; Khác
nl: Functies van braadoven: Airfryen; Bakken; Braden; Convectie; Ontdooien; Warm houden; Pizza; Verwarmen; Braden; Rotisserie; Langzaam koken; Stoom; Overig
nb: Stekeovn-funksjoner: Luftsteking; Bake; Grille; Konveksjon; Tining; Hold varm; Pizza; Varm opp igjen; Stek; Rotisseri; Langsom tilberedning; Damp; Annet